Massachusetts, session 194th, S1784.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Clause Twenty-sixth of section 7 of chapter 4 of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following subclause:-
(w) Photographs and other personal identifying information collected pursuant to section
17E through section 17I of chapter 90.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official edition, is hereby amended by adding the following definitions:-
“Construction zone speed control system”, a camera system that monitors and detects
motor vehicle speed limits in an active construction zone, as defined in section 17D of this
chapter. Construction zone speed control systems shall meet the requirements described in
section 17E of this chapter.
of 10

“Personally identifiable information”, information created or maintained by the
department or a vendor that identifies or describes an owner and includes, but is not limited to,
the owner's address, telephone number, number plate, photograph, bank account information,
credit card number, debit card number or the date, time, location or direction of travel on a
highway.
SECTION 3. Chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding the following sections:-
Section 17E. (a)(1) The department may install and operate construction zone speed
control systems in active construction zones as defined in section 17D of this chapter. Any
system shall be limited to monitoring and detecting speed violations that exceed the posted speed
limit by fifteen miles per hour or more in violation of section 17D of this chapter.
(2) In determining where to install and operate construction zone speed control systems,
the department shall give due consideration to locations with high traffic volumes and known
accident hotspots.
(b) Signage shall be displayed in any active construction zones where construction zone
speed control systems are in use which clearly alerts motorists to the use of said system. The
signage shall remain in place at all times while the system is in operation.
(c)(1) The department may enter into an agreement with a private vendor or manufacturer
to provide for the design, installation, operation and maintenance, or any combination thereof, of
construction zone speed control systems.
of 10

(2) Any money paid to the manufacturer or vendor of a construction zone speed control
system shall not be based upon the revenue generated by the use of such system. Any money
paid to the manufacturer or vendor of the system, including, but not limited to, equipment, shall
be based upon the value of the system and equipment installed and the recurring services
provided in support of the systems, including the processing of evidence files, cost of the
technology provided and maintenance of such technology.
(d) The department, in collaboration with the Massachusetts State Police, shall conduct a
public awareness campaign to inform motorists of the use of construction zone speed control
systems.
Section 17F. (a) No person operating a motor vehicle shall exceed the posted speed limit
by fifteen or more miles per hour, as detected by a construction zone speed control system,
within an active construction zone where a construction zone speed control system is operational.
(b) A violation of this section shall be punishable by a fine as established in Section 17D
of this chapter. The owner of a motor vehicle identified by a construction zone speed camera
control system shall be liable for any such fine imposed unless the driver of the motor vehicle
received a citation from a law enforcement officer at the time of the violation.
(c) The fines pursuant to this section shall be applied whether the violation is detected
through the use of a construction zone speed control system or by a police officer on scene who
issues a written citation to the operator of the motor vehicle. All fines imposed for a speeding
violation in accordance with this section that is detected by a construction zone speed control
system or by a police officer who cites the operator in hand shall be paid to the department.
of 10

Section 17G. (a)(1) All construction zone speed control systems shall produce an
evidence file that includes a live visual video image viewable remotely, a recorded video image
of the license plate and the capacity to record the date, time and location of the vehicle
committing a speeding violation.
(2) A system’s recorded video images and still photographic images shall record the rear
of the motor vehicle with: (i) at least 1 photographic image and 1 recorded video image clearly
recording the motor vehicle operating at a rate of speed in excess of the posted speed limit in an
active construction zone; and (ii) at least 1 photographic image and 1 recorded video image shall
clearly identify the registration plate of the motor vehicle.
(3) To the extent practicable, any construction zone speed control system shall use
necessary technology to ensure that photographs or recorded video images produced by the
system shall not include a frontal view photograph or video image of the motor vehicle that
identify the operator, passengers or contents of the vehicle; provided, however, that no notice of
violation issued under this section shall be dismissed solely because a photograph or recorded
video image allow for the identification of the operator, passengers or contents of a vehicle if a
reasonable effort has been made to comply with this subsection.
(b)(1) Other than for purposes of enforcement of a violation of this section or for
purposes of an owner defending a violation of this section, recorded video images and
photographs taken or created under this section shall only be obtained under an order by a court
of competent jurisdiction.
(2) All recorded video and photographic images and other information obtained through
the use of a construction zone speed control system, as authorized in this section, that do not
of 10

identify a violation shall be destroyed by the department or vendor within 30 days of the date the
image was recorded, unless otherwise ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction. All recorded
video and photographic images and other information that identify a violation shall be destroyed
within 1 year of final disposition of proceedings related to the enforcement or defense of a
violation, unless otherwise ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction. The department and any
vendor under agreement utilizing 1 or more construction zone speed control systems shall file
notice attested under penalties of perjury annually within 30 days of the close of the fiscal year
with the state secretary that records have been destroyed in accordance with this paragraph. All
recorded video and photographic images and other information, however stored or retained,
obtained through systems authorized in this section shall be the property of the department under
agreement with a vendor and shall not be used by a vendor for any other purpose. Upon the
expiration of any agreement authorized under this section, all of said video and photographic
images and other information shall be delivered within 30 days to the department unless
otherwise ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction.
Section 17H. (a)(1) Whenever a construction zone speed control system detects and
produces recorded images of a motor vehicle allegedly committing a violation of section 17D, a
sworn member or authorized member of the Massachusetts State Police shall review the recorded
images provided by such system. If, after such review, such member determines that there are
reasonable grounds to believe that a violation has occurred, such member may issue a notice of
violation for the alleged violation. Such notice of violation shall be sworn or affirmed by such
member and shall be prima facie evidence of the facts contained in the notice. Such notice of
violation shall include written verification that the construction zone speed control system was
of 10

operating correctly at the time of the alleged violation and specify the date of the most recent
inspection that confirms the construction zone speed limit system to be operating properly.
(2) The notice of violation for the alleged violation of section 17D shall include (i) a copy
of the recorded image showing the vehicle with its number plate visible, (ii) the registration
100 number and state of issuance of the vehicle registration, (iii) verification that the construction
101 zone speed control system was operating correctly at the time of the alleged violation and the
102 date of the most recent calibration check, and (iv) the date, time and location of the alleged
103 violation.
104 (3) In the case of an alleged violation of section 17D involving a motor vehicle registered
105 in the state, the notice of violation shall be mailed not later than thirty days after the commission
106 of the alleged violation or after the identity of the owner is ascertained, whichever is later, to the
107 address of the owner that is in the records of the department.
108 (4) In the case of an alleged violation of section 17D involving a motor vehicle registered
109 in another jurisdiction, the notice of the violation shall be mailed not later than thirty days after
110 the identity of the owner is ascertained to the address of the owner that is in the records of the
111 official in the other jurisdiction issuing such registration.
112 (5) A notice of violation shall be invalid unless mailed to an owner not later than ninety
113 days after the alleged violation of section 17D.
114 (6) The notice of violation shall be sent by first class mail. A manual or automatic record
115 of mailing prepared by the construction zone speed control system operator in the ordinary
116 course of business shall be prima facie evidence of mailing and shall be admissible in any court
117 proceeding as to the facts contained in the notice.
of 10

118 (7) Upon the determination of a violation through the use of a construction zone speed
119 control system, it shall be the duty of the chief of the Massachusetts State Police, or any designee
120 of the chief, to issue the owner of the vehicle a citation pursuant to chapter 90C.
121 (b)(1) A construction zone speed control system operator shall complete training offered
122 by the manufacturer of such system, including training on any devices critical to the operation of
123 such system or the manufacturer's representative in the procedures for setting up, testing and
124 operating such system. Upon completion of the training, the manufacturer or manufacturer's
125 representative shall issue a signed certificate to the construction zone speed control system
126 operator. Such signed certificate shall be admitted as evidence in any court proceeding for an
127 alleged violation of section 17D.
128 (2) A construction zone speed control system operator shall complete and sign a daily log
129 for a construction zone speed control system. Such daily log shall (i) state the date, time and
130 location of such system's set-up, (ii) state that the construction zone speed control system
131 operator successfully performed, and the construction zone speed system passed, the testing
132 specified by the manufacturer of the construction zone speed system, (iii) be kept on file at the
133 principle office of the operator, and (iv) be admitted in any court proceeding for an alleged
134 violation of section 17D.
135 (3) A construction zone speed control system shall undergo an annual calibration check
136 performed at a calibration laboratory. The calibration laboratory shall issue a signed certificate of
137 calibration after the annual calibration check. Such signed certificate of calibration shall be kept
138 on file and admitted as evidence in any court proceeding for an alleged violation of section 17D.
of 10

139 (c) Any recorded video images or still photographic images produced by a construction
140 zone speed control system evidencing the violation shall be available for inspection in any
141 proceeding to adjudicate the liability for the violation adopted under this section.
142 (d) In all actions of speeding violations based on evidence obtained from a construction
143 zone speed control system pursuant to this section, the registered owner of the motor vehicle
144 shall be primarily responsible except as otherwise provided in this section.
145 (e) The following defenses shall be available to the owner of a motor vehicle identified
146 by a construction zone speed camera control system as allegedly violating section 17D: (1) The
147 violation took place during a period of time in which the motor vehicle had been reported as
148 being stolen to a law enforcement unit and had not been recovered prior to the time of the
149 violation, or (2) the construction zone speed control system used to determine speed was not in
150 compliance with the provisions of this section relating to tests for accuracy, certification or
151 calibration.
152 (f) In the event that the registered owner of a vehicle operated in violation of this section
153 was not the operator of the vehicle at the time of the violation, the registered owner of the
154 vehicle shall: (1) assume liability for the violation by paying the fine; (2) upon written receipt of
155 the citation, provide the issuing authority within 30 days of the date of issuance with the name,
156 address and registration plate number of the operator of the vehicle who was responsible along
157 with a signed affidavit acknowledging such; or (3) defend the violation pursuant to the
158 procedures established for speeding violations under this chapter.
159 (g) A vehicle owned or leased to a corporation that is identified by a construction zone
160 speed control system under this section shall be primarily responsible for a violation pursuant to
of 10

161 this section even if a person who normally operates the vehicle for the corporation denies that
162 they were operating the vehicle at the time of the violation.
163 (h) An owner who receives a notice of violation pursuant to the provisions of this section
164 shall follow the procedures set forth in section 3 of this chapter.
165 (i) The administrator of the department shall submit an annual report to the department’s
166 board of directors. The report shall contain: (i) data on the number of citations issued under this
167 section at each particular active construction zone, and of those citations, shall detail: (A) the
168 number paid without a request for a hearing; (B) the number found responsible after a hearing;
169 and (C) the number dismissed after a hearing; and (ii) the cost to maintain each system and the
170 amount of revenue obtained from each system.
171 Section 17I. (a) No personally identifiable information collected by a construction zone
172 speed control system shall be sold or disclosed by the department or a vendor to any person or
173 entity except where the disclosure is made (1) in connection with the charging, collection and
174 enforcement of the fines imposed pursuant to section 17F, (2) pursuant to a judicial order,
175 including a search warrant or subpoena, in a criminal proceeding, or (3) to comply with federal
176 or state laws or regulations.
177 (b) No personally identifiable information shall be stored or retained by the department or
178 a vendor unless such information is necessary for the collection and enforcement of the fines
179 imposed pursuant to Section 17F.
180 (c) Except as otherwise provided by law or in connection with an administrative
181 summons or judicial order, including a search warrant or subpoena, in a criminal proceeding, the
182 department or a vendor shall destroy personally identifiable information and other data that
of 10

183 specifically identifies a motor vehicle and relates to a violation of Section 17F not later than one
184 year after any fine is imposed or the resolution of a trial conducted for the alleged commission of
185 such violation.
186 (d) Personally identifiable customer information shall not be deemed a public record, for
187 purposes of the Freedom of Information Act, as defined in Section 1-200.
188 Section 17J. (a) The department may adopt regulations to implement the provisions of
189 sections 17E through 17I of this chapter and establish standards and procedures for construction
190 zone speed control systems.
191 SECTION 4. The commonwealth shall allocate necessary funds from the Highway Fund
192 to implement the provisions of this Act.
193 The provisions of this act are severable and if any provision, or portion thereof, should be
194 held to be unconstitutional or otherwise invalid by any court of competent jurisdiction, such
195 unconstitutionality or invalidity shall not affect the remaining provisions, which remain in full
196 force and effect.
197 This Act shall take effect 90 days after its passage.
of 10